Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 4

Security

9-4-401. Preference in insolvency.

In the liquidation of insolvent state depositories, the return of all state deposits, including funds held in trust by state officials, shall be preferred in payment.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 31.

9-4-402. Reports by commissioner of financial institutions.

It is the duty of the commissioner of financial institutions to advise, on a timely basis, the state treasurer and the commissioner of finance and administration of the condition of each state bank and state chartered savings and loan association, including recommendations regarding its condition and safety as a state depository.

It is the duty of the commissioner of financial institutions to make inquiry, on a timely basis, of the United States comptroller of the currency, respecting the condition and safety of each national bank as a state depository, and to advise the state treasurer and the commissioner of finance and administration of the results.

It is the duty of the commissioner of financial institutions to make inquiry, on a timely basis, of the federal deposit insurance corporation, respecting the condition and safety of each federally chartered federal savings bank as a state depository, and to advise the state treasurer and the commissioner of finance and administration of the results.

Any doubts as to the safety of any state depository shall be resolved by the state treasurer and the commissioner of finance and administration against the depository; in the event the two (2) disagree, the commissioner of financial institutions shall vote.

If determined to be necessary under subsection (d), steps toward further security or realization shall be taken in accordance with the direction of the state treasurer and the commissioner of finance and administration. Such steps may include a requirement that additional collateral be pledged or all or a portion of the state deposit may be withdrawn without penalty or forfeiture of interest.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 32.

Attorney General Opinions. Designation of a branch of an out-of-state bank as a state depository, OAG 97-031, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 30 (3/31/97).

9-4-403. Giving of security.

All state funds held in state depositories shall be secured by required collateral as provided in §9-4-404, except for funds on deposit in the name of the state with a federal reserve bank.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 33; 2017, ch. 65, § 2.

9-4-404. Valuation of eligible collateral.

The state treasurer shall evaluate the market value of required collateral monthly, and more frequently if market conditions require.

Any state depository whose collateral has a market value less than one hundred five percent (105%) of the value of its state deposits, less so much of such amount as is protected by the federal deposit insurance corporation, shall provide additional collateral at the request of the state treasurer.

If within two (2) working days such additional collateral is not provided, the state treasurer shall submit to the commissioners of financial institutions and of finance and administration a written summary of the results of the market valuation of collateral for that depository, together with a summary of the deposits secured by the collateral and take such action as a majority of these three (3) officials, based upon information received pursuant to § 9-4-402, deems appropriate. Such action may include withdrawal of part or all of the state deposit in that depository without penalty or forfeiture of interest.

The state treasurer, county trustee or other public official charged with the deposit of public funds may contract for the evaluation of the market value of required collateral. Such contract may be with any person, including a financial institution or trustee custodian; provided, that such contract may not be with the depository pledging the collateral to be valued.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 34; 1992, ch. 592, § 9; 1994, ch. 752, § 12.

9-4-405. Interest on collateral.

Prior to default, the state treasurer, county trustee or other public official charged with the deposit of public funds and the trustee custodian, if the collateral is held by a trustee custodian, is authorized to remit to the state depository any and all interest, distributions or prepayments of any kind, upon eligible collateral pledged by such depository.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 35; 1994, ch. 752, § 13.

9-4-406. Default.

Default shall be deemed to occur whenever any state depository fails to return any state deposit including earned interest when due in accordance with the terms of the deposit contract.

In all other situations, as defined in § 9-4-102, where the safety or security of state deposits is in doubt, the state treasurer shall determine whether default has occurred, and the date on which it occurred, following consultation with the other members of the state funding board, the attorney general and reporter and the commissioner of financial institutions. Once the state treasurer has made such a determination, the other state officials with whom the state treasurer consulted shall be advised.

In the event of default by any state depository, the state depository shall be responsible for any loss to the state.

Such loss shall be satisfied out of collateral pledged by the state depository to whatever extent possible.

Collateral pledged in accordance with this part may be sold by the state treasurer or, at the direction of the state treasurer, by the trustee custodian or any other person, including a federal agency, holding such collateral. In the alternative, the state treasurer may choose to hold such collateral. If the state treasurer holds such collateral, loss shall be reduced by the market value of the collateral and any accrued interest thereon as of the date of default.

The attorney general and reporter is authorized to prosecute, in the name of the state, actions for recovery of any loss incurred by the state under this section.

Excess proceeds, if any, realized from the sale of collateral will be returned to the defaulting state depository or its successor.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 36.

9-4-407. Safekeeping of securities.

The state treasurer is expressly authorized to contract for the safekeeping and servicing of eligible collateral and/or securities owned by the Tennessee consolidated retirement system and/or other securities of which the state treasurer is the custodian.

The state treasurer is expressly authorized, if the state treasurer deems it advisable, to insure securities against theft or other loss.

All expenses incidental to the safekeeping and servicing of securities other than eligible collateral shall be paid by the state agency or the retirement system charged with the responsibility of the securities.

The state of Tennessee shall be liable to the state depository for any loss of eligible collateral arising from embezzlement and/or theft while in the possession of the state treasurer or under the state treasurer's dominion or control under this section. The state of Tennessee is not liable, however, for loss to the state depository from market fluctuations in the value of collateral or loss to such depository while the collateral is in possession of any common carrier in route to or from the state depository to or from the state treasurer.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 37.

9-4-408. Trust receipts.

In lieu of the actual deposit of eligible collateral under § 9-4-407, the state treasurer is authorized, at the state treasurer's option, to accept trust receipts.

Trust receipts shall be issued by trustee custodians in a form acceptable to the state treasurer following the deposit of eligible collateral with the trustee custodian by a state depository.

Eligible collateral deposited with a trustee custodian shall be subject in all respects to the claims and rights of the state to the same extent as though such collateral had been physically deposited with the state treasurer under § 9-4-407.

Each trust receipt shall be nonnegotiable and irrevocable and shall continue in full force and effect until surrendered by the issuing trustee custodian with the release of the state treasurer endorsed thereon over the state treasurer's signature or as otherwise released pursuant to subsection (g) or (h).

The state treasurer may present the trust receipt at any time to the issuing trustee custodian and upon delivery thereof shall be entitled to receive any and all collateral represented thereby from the trustee custodian, and such collateral shall thereafter be held by the state treasurer as if deposited with the state treasurer by the state depository as collateral, without further liability on the part of the trustee custodian.

Following delivery of the collateral to the state treasurer, the state treasurer is permitted to register such collateral in the name of the state and to hold it on behalf of the state depository.

The state treasurer is authorized to establish alternative procedures for the deposit and release of eligible collateral held on the state treasurer's behalf by trustee custodians pursuant to this chapter.

A county or city official charged with the deposit of public funds is authorized to contract for alternative procedures for the deposit and release of eligible collateral held on the behalf of the county or city by a trustee custodian pursuant to this chapter. The alternative procedure established may be the procedure adopted by the state treasurer in subsection (g), or must provide for a release of collateral only upon the authorization of the county or city official or a person authorized by law to act on behalf of the official. The official's authorization shall be given in writing and delivered, sent or transmitted to the trustee in any reasonable manner, including, without limitation, by means of telephonic facsimile transmission.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 38; 1990, ch. 1043, § 2; 1994, ch. 752, §§ 10, 11.

Cross-References. Applicability to trustee custodians, §9-4-505.

9-4-409. Trustee custodians.

When any trustee custodian holds collateral for a state depository which is related to the custodian through shared ownership or control, such collateral shall be held in a restricted account at a federal reserve bank or branch thereof or at a federal home loan bank or branch thereof.

The state treasurer is expressly authorized either in person or by agent to examine and check the collateral held by the trustee custodian and to require reasonable reports from the trustee custodian.

Neither the state nor the state treasurer is liable to the state depository for eligible collateral deposited with or held by any trustee custodian, for any loss arising from any breach of the trust or agreement or from any other cause while such eligible collateral is in the possession or custody of such trustee custodian pursuant to a trust receipt.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 39; 1990, ch. 702, § 7.

Cross-References. Applicability to trustee custodians, §9-4-505.